Maryland, session 2025, SB0901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1702.
(a) There is an Office of Recycling created within the Department.
(d) The Office shall:
(1) Assist the counties in developing an acceptable recycling plan required
under § 9–1703 of this subtitle and § 9–505 of this title, including technical assistance to
the local governments;
(2) Coordinate the efforts of the State to facilitate the implementation of
the recycling goals at the county level;
(3) Review all recycling plans submitted as part of a county plan as
required under § 9–505 of this title and advise the Secretary on the adequacy of the
recycling plan;
(4) Administer the Statewide Electronics Recycling Program under Part IV
of this subtitle;
(5) Promote the development of markets for recycled materials and
recycled products in the State in accordance with § 9–1702.1 of this subtitle; [and]
(6) Review and approve plans and annual reports, including the paint
stewardship assessment, submitted in accordance with a Paint Stewardship Program
established under Part V of this subtitle; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(7) REVIEW AND APPROVE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ADVISORY COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–2503 OF THIS TITLE,
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLANS AND ANNUAL REPORTS SUBMITTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 25 OF THIS TITLE.
9–1702.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVISORY COUNCIL” AND “PRODUCER” HAVE THE
MEANINGS SECTION, “ADVISORY COUNCIL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–2501
OF THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 30, 2034, AND AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 10
YEARS THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE SHALL HIRE AN INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT TO
CONDUCT A STATEWIDE RECYCLING NEEDS ASSESSMENT TO INFORM THE
PROVISION OF RECYCLING SERVICES IN THE STATE INCLUDING IMPLEMENTATION
OF SUBTITLE 25 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE NEEDS ASSESSMENT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AN ANALYSIS OF THE STATE’S CURRENT SOLID WASTE
STREAMS, INCLUDING:
1. SOLID WASTE GENERATED IN THE STATE BY LOCAL
JURISDICTION, TYPE, AND MATERIAL;
2. DISPOSAL METHODS BY MATERIAL TYPE AND
AMOUNT; AND
3. ASSOCIATED COSTS AND REVENUES FOR SOLID
WASTE DISPOSAL PROGRAMS;
(II) AN ANALYSIS OF THE STATE’S CURRENT RECYCLING
STREAMS, INCLUDING:
1. RECYCLABLE MATERIALS PROCESSED BY LOCAL
JURISDICTION, TYPE, AND AMOUNT;
2. PROCESSING METHODS BY MATERIAL TYPE AND
AMOUNT;
3. ASSOCIATED COSTS AND REVENUES FOR RECYCLING
PROGRAMS, COLLECTION, AND TIPPING FEES; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. AN ESTIMATE OF THE AMOUNT OF RECYCLABLE
MATERIALS THAT ARE NOT CURRENTLY BEING RECYCLED; AND
5. AN ESTIMATE OF THE AMOUNT OF REUSABLE
PACKAGING THAT IS NOT CURRENTLY BEING REUSED;
(III) AN EVALUATION OF THE CURRENT INFRASTRUCTURE AND
CAPACITY RELATED TO, NEED FOR, AND ASSOCIATED COSTS OF:
1. RECYCLING ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY;
2. COLLECTING AND HAULING RECYCLABLE,
REUSABLE, OR COMPOSTABLE MATERIALS IN THE STATE;
3. PROCESSING RECYCLABLE OR COMPOSTABLE
MATERIALS IN THE STATE;
4. TAKING ADVANTAGE OF FAVORABLE MARKET
CONDITIONS OR OTHER OPPORTUNITIES FOR INCREASING RECYCLING, REUSE, OR
ORGANICS RECYCLING IN THE STATE;
5. IN COORDINATION WITH LOCAL GOVERNMENTS,
CONSUMER EDUCATION REGARDING RECYCLING, ORGANICS RECYCLING, REUSABLE
PACKAGING, AND CONTAMINATION REDUCTION;
6. REUSE INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
7. ORGANICS RECYCLING INFRASTRUCTURE;
(IV) AN EVALUATION OF COMMINGLED RECYCLING PROCESSING
FACILITY WORKER CONDITIONS, WAGES, AND BENEFITS;
(V) AN EVALUATION OF OPPORTUNITIES IN THE RECYCLING
AND REUSE SYSTEM FOR WOMEN AND MINORITY INDIVIDUALS;
(VI) AN EVALUATION OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT REQUIREMENTS
RELATED TO MULTIFAMILY AND COMMERCIAL RECYCLING SERVICES AND THEIR
IMPLEMENTATION;
(VII) THE SUFFICIENCY OF RECYCLING AND REUSE EDUCATION
PROGRAMS RELATIVE TO DESIRED EQUITY OUTCOMES;
(VIII) AN EVALUATION OF THE ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITIES IN THE
STATE’S RECYCLING AND REUSE SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
1. STATE AND LOCAL REVENUE THAT MAY BE
CONSIDERED LOST BECAUSE RECYCLABLE MATERIALS ARE NOT BEING RECYCLED;
2. CURRENT JOBS ASSOCIATED WITH THE SOLID WASTE,
REUSE, AND RECYCLING INDUSTRIES;
3. OPPORTUNITIES TO INCREASE EMPLOYMENT IN THE
RECYCLING INDUSTRY BY MATERIAL TYPE;
4. BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES ASSOCIATED WITH
RECYCLING OR REUSABLE PACKAGING;
5. BARRIERS TO INCREASING THE USE OF RECYCLABLE
MATERIALS AS FEEDSTOCK FOR PRINCIPAL PROCESSORS AND MANUFACTURERS
AND MEANS OF ELIMINATING THOSE BARRIERS; AND
6. RECOMMENDATIONS FOR INCENTIVES TO STIMULATE
JOB GROWTH AND BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES IN THE STATE’S RECYCLING
INDUSTRY AND REUSABLE PACKAGING INDUSTRIES;
(IX) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVING EQUITY AND
EQUITABLE OUTCOMES FOR UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS IN THE STATE’S
RECYCLING SYSTEM;
(X) AN ANALYSIS OF THE COSTS AND BENEFITS OF
IMPLEMENTING AN EXTENDED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM, INCLUDING
TO:
1. LOCAL GOVERNMENTS;
2. WASTE PRODUCERS;
3. RESIDENTS; AND
4. WASTE MANAGEMENT COMPANIES;
(XI) AN ANALYSIS OF THE POTENTIAL ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT
OF AN EXTENDED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAM, INCLUDING THROUGH:
1. INCREASED RECYCLING;
2. RESOURCE RECOVERY;
– 5 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. WASTE REDUCTION; AND
4. REDUCED ENVIRONMENTAL DAMAGE; AND
(XII) RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE BEST PRACTICES TO FOLLOW
FROM SUCCESSFUL EXTENDED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAMS IN OTHER
STATES AND COUNTRIES.
(C) THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT ON THE RESULTS OF EACH ASSESSMENT
CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(D) IN CONDUCTING AN ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
INDEPENDENT CONSULTANT SHALL CONSULT WITH PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS, THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ADVISORY COUNCIL
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–2503 OF THIS TITLE, APPROPRIATE LOCAL
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES, AND REGIONAL SOLID WASTE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE
STATE.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE THE
OFFICE SHALL ESTABLISH AND COLLECT A FEE TO BE PAID BY PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS TO COVER THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
CONDUCTING AN:
(1) THE ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER CHAPTER 465 OF THE ACTS
OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2023; AND
(2) EACH SUBSEQUENT ASSESSMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) BEFORE ESTABLISHING AND COLLECTING A FEE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL:
(I) PUBLISH A PROPOSED FEE ON ITS WEBSITE; AND
(II) ALLOW 90 CALENDAR DAYS FOR PUBLIC COMMENT.
9–1707.
(f) (1) There is a State Recycling Trust Fund.
(2) The Fund shall consist of:
(i) The newsprint recycling incentive fee;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(ii) The telephone directory recycling incentive fee collected under §
9–1709 of this subtitle;
(iii) The covered electronic device manufacturer registration fee
collected under § 9–1728 of this subtitle;
(iv) The Paint Stewardship Program plan and annual report review
fees collected under § 9–1733(b) and (h) of this subtitle;
(V) ANY FEES COLLECTED FROM PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS UNDER § 9–1702.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR SUBTITLE 25 OF THIS
TITLE;
[(v)] (VI) All fines and penalties collected under this subtitle AND §
9–2510 § 9–2512 OF THIS TITLE;
[(vi)] (VII) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
[(vii)] (VIII) Any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(5) At the end of each fiscal year, any unspent or unencumbered balance in
the Fund that exceeds $2,000,000 shall revert to the General Fund of the State in
accordance with § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) In accordance with the State budget, the Fund shall be used only:
(i) To provide grants to the counties to be used by the counties to
develop and implement local recycling plans;
(ii) To provide grants to counties that have addressed methods for
the separate collection and recycling of covered electronic devices in accordance with §
9–1703(c)(1) of this subtitle;
(iii) To provide grants to municipalities to be used by the
municipalities to implement local covered electronic device recycling programs;
(iv) To cover the costs of the Paint Stewardship Program plan review
under § 9–1733(b) of this subtitle, the annual report review under § 9–1733(h) of this
subtitle, and associated costs for Program compliance oversight; [and]
– 7 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO COVER THE COSTS OF A STATEWIDE RECYCLING NEEDS
ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED UNDER § 9–1702.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(VI) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO COVER THE COSTS OF PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN REVIEW,
OVERSIGHT, AND ENFORCEMENT UNDER SUBTITLE 25 OF THIS TITLE; AND
[(v)] (VII) To carry out the purposes of the land management
administration.
(7) (I) THERE IS A SEPARATE ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND.
(II) THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT SHALL CONSIST OF:
1. ANY FEES COLLECTED FROM PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS UNDER § 9–1702.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR
SUBTITLE 25 OF THIS TITLE; AND
2. ALL FINES AND PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER §
9–2510 § 9–2512 OF THIS TITLE.
(III) THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT SHALL BE USED ONLY FOR THE
COSTS OF STATEWIDE RECYCLING NEEDS ASSESSMENTS CONDUCTED UNDER §
9–1702.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN REVIEW,
OVERSIGHT, AND ENFORCEMENT UNDER SUBTITLE 25 OF THIS TITLE.
[(7)] (8) (i) The Treasurer shall invest the money in the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
Subtitle 25. Producer Responsibility for Packaging [Materials] AND PAPER PRODUCTS.
9–2501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Advisory council” means the producer responsibility advisory council
established under § 9–2503 of this subtitle.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(c) (1) “BEVERAGE CONTAINER” MEANS A PREPACKAGED BEVERAGE
CONTAINER:
(1) (I) MADE OF ANY MATERIAL, INCLUDING GLASS, PLASTIC,
METAL, OR MULTIMATERIALS;
(2) (II) IN ANY FORM, INCLUDING A BOTTLE, CAN, CARTON, OR
POUCH; AND
(3) (III) THE VOLUME OF WHICH IS NOT MORE THAN 5 LITERS.
(2) “BEVERAGE CONTAINER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PREPACKAGED
BEVERAGE CONTAINER THAT IS COVERED UNDER A BEVERAGE CONTAINER DEPOSIT
RETURN PROGRAM IN THE STATE.
(D) “BRAND OWNER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS OR LICENSES A BRAND
OR THAT OTHERWISE HAS RIGHTS TO MARKET A PRODUCT UNDER THE BRAND,
WHETHER OR NOT THE BRAND’S TRADEMARK IS REGISTERED.
(E) “COMPOSTING” AND “COMPOSTING FACILITY” HAVE THE MEANINGS
STATED IN § 9–1701 OF THIS TITLE.
(F) “COVERED ENTITY” MEANS A PERSON OR LOCATION THAT RECEIVES
COVERED SERVICES FOR COVERED MATERIALS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(1) A SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE;
(2) A MULTIFAMILY RESIDENCE;
(3) A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC KINDERGARTEN, ELEMENTARY, OR
SECONDARY SCHOOL;
(4) A CHILD CARE CENTER, AS DEFINED IN § 9.5–401 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE; AND
(5) A PUBLIC BUILDING OWNED OR OPERATED BY THE STATE OR A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(G) (1) “COVERED MATERIALS” MEANS PACKAGING AND PAPER
PRODUCTS SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, IMPORTED, OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE.
(2) “COVERED MATERIALS” DOES NOT INCLUDE EXEMPT MATERIALS.
– 9 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(H) “COVERED MATERIAL TYPE” MEANS A SINGULAR AND SPECIFIC TYPE OF
COVERED MATERIAL, SUCH AS PAPER, PLASTIC, METAL, OR GLASS, THAT:
(1) CAN BE CATEGORIZED BASED ON DISTINGUISHING CHEMICAL OR
PHYSICAL PROPERTIES, INCLUDING PROPERTIES THAT ALLOW THE MATERIAL TYPE
TO BE AGGREGATED INTO A DISCRETE COMMODITY CATEGORY FOR PURPOSES OF
REUSE, RECYCLING, OR COMPOSTING; AND
(2) IS BASED ON SIMILAR USES IN THE FORM OF A PRODUCT OR
PACKAGE.
(I) (1) “COVERED SERVICES” MEANS:
(I) COLLECTING, TRANSFERRING, TRANSPORTING, SORTING,
PROCESSING, RECOVERING, PREPARING, OR OTHERWISE MANAGING COVERED
MATERIALS FOR PURPOSES OF WASTE REDUCTION, REUSE, RECYCLING, OR
COMPOSTING; AND
(II) PUBLIC EDUCATION AND OUTREACH ACTIVITIES RELATED
TO THE ACTIVITIES DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) “COVERED SERVICES” DOES NOT INCLUDE DISPOSAL OF
COVERED MATERIALS.
(J) “DE MINIMIS PRODUCER” MEANS A PERSON THAT IN THEIR MOST
RECENT FISCAL YEAR:
(1) INTRODUCED LESS THAN 1 TON OF COVERED MATERIAL INTO THE
STATE; OR
(2) EARNED GLOBAL GROSS REVENUES OF LESS THAN $2,000,000.
(K) “ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT” MEANS THE IMPACT OF A COVERED
MATERIAL ON HUMAN HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT, BEGINNING WITH THE
EXTRACTION AND PROCESSING OF THE RAW MATERIALS THAT COMPOSE THE
COVERED MATERIAL THROUGH THE MANUFACTURING, DISTRIBUTION, USE,
RECOVERY FOR REUSE, RECYCLING OR COMPOSTING, AND FINAL DISPOSAL OF THE
COVERED MATERIAL.
(L) “EXEMPT MATERIAL” MEANS A MATERIAL, OR ANY PORTION OF A
MATERIAL, THAT IS:
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(1) PACKAGING FOR INFANT FORMULA, AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. §
321(Z);
(2) PACKAGING FOR MEDICAL FOOD, AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. §
360EE(B)(3);
(3) PACKAGING FOR A FORTIFIED ORAL NUTRITIONAL SUPPLEMENT,
OR FOOD WHICH IS FORMULATED TO BE CONSUMED OR ADMINISTERED ENTERALLY
FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE UNABLE TO CONSUME NUTRITION ORALLY, USED BY
INDIVIDUALS WHO REQUIRE SUPPLEMENTAL OR SOLE SOURCE NUTRITION TO MEET
NUTRITIONAL OR SPECIAL DIETARY NEEDS DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE FOLLOWING
CONDITIONS AS DEFINED BY THE INTERNATIONAL CLASSIFICATION OF DISEASES,
TENTH REVISION:
(I) CANCER;
(II) CHRONIC KIDNEY DISEASE;
(III) DIABETES;
(IV) MALNUTRITION; OR
(V) FAILURE TO THRIVE;
(4) PACKAGING FOR A PRODUCT REGULATED AS A DRUG OR MEDICAL
DEVICE BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING ASSOCIATED
COMPONENTS AND CONSUMABLE MEDICAL EQUIPMENT;
(5) PACKAGING FOR MEDICAL EQUIPMENT OR A PRODUCT USED IN
MEDICAL SETTINGS THAT IS REGULATED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING ASSOCIATED COMPONENTS AND CONSUMABLE
MEDICAL EQUIPMENT;
(6) DRUGS, BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS, PARASITICIDES, MEDICAL
DEVICES, OR IN VITRO DIAGNOSTICS THAT ARE USED TO TREAT, OR THAT ARE
ADMINISTERED TO, ANIMALS AND ARE REGULATED BY:
(I) THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION UNDER THE
FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT; OR
(II) THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE UNDER THE
FEDERAL VIRUS–SERUM–TOXIN ACT;
– 11 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) PACKAGING FOR PRODUCTS REGULATED BY THE U.S.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY UNDER THE FEDERAL INSECTICIDE,
FUNGICIDE, AND RODENTICIDE ACT;
(8) PACKAGING USED TO CONTAIN LIQUEFIED PETROLEUM GAS AND
DESIGNED TO BE REFILLED;
(9) NEWSPRINT SUBJECT TO § 9–1707 OF THIS TITLE;
(10) A PAPER PRODUCT USED FOR A MAGAZINE’S PRINT PUBLICATION
THAT HAS A CIRCULATION OF LESS THAN 95,000 AND THAT PRIMARILY INCLUDES
CONTENT DERIVED FROM PRIMARY SOURCES RELATED TO NEWS AND CURRENT
EVENTS;
(11) PACKAGING USED TO CONTAIN HAZARDOUS OR FLAMMABLE
PRODUCTS REGULATED UNDER THE 2012 FEDERAL OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND
HEALTH ADMINISTRATION HAZARD COMMUNICATION STANDARD THAT PREVENT
THE PACKAGING FROM BEING WASTE REDUCED OR MADE REUSABLE, RECYCLABLE,
OR COMPOSTABLE, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(12) PACKAGING COLLECTED AND PROPERLY MANAGED THROUGH
FOR PRODUCTS SUBJECT TO THE PAINT STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM UNDER SUBTITLE
17, PART V OF THIS TITLE; OR
(13) MATERIAL THAT A PRODUCER DISTRIBUTES TO ANOTHER
PRODUCER THAT IS:
(I) SUBSEQUENTLY USED TO CONTAIN A PRODUCT, AND THE
PRODUCT IS DISTRIBUTED TO A COMMERCIAL BUSINESS OR ENTITY; AND
(II) NOT INTRODUCED TO A PERSON OTHER THAN THE
COMMERCIAL OR BUSINESS ENTITY THAT FIRST RECEIVED THE PRODUCT; OR
(14) PACKAGING USED FOR THE LONG–TERM PROTECTION OR
STORAGE OF A PRODUCT THAT HAS A LIFESPAN OF NOT LESS THAN 5 YEARS, AS
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) (M) “Local government” means:
(1) A county; or
(2) A municipality.
[(d)] (E) “Organics recycling” has the meaning stated in § 9–1701 of this title.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(F) “ORGANICS RECYCLING FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–1701 OF THIS TITLE.
(G) “PACKAGING MATERIAL WASTE” MEANS THE PERCENTAGE OF THE
TOTAL WEIGHT OF PACKAGING MATERIALS SOLD OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE
THAT ARE NOT RECYCLED, REUSED, OR COMPOSTED.
[(e)] (H) (N) (1) “Packaging materials” means, regardless of recyclability,
any part of a package or container, including material that is used for the containment,
protection, handling, delivery, and presentation of a product MEANS A MATERIAL, A
SUBSTANCE, OR AN OBJECT THAT IS USED TO PROTECT, CONTAIN, TRANSPORT,
SERVE, OR FACILITATE THE DELIVERY OF A PRODUCT THAT IS SOLD OR SUPPLIED
WITH THE PRODUCT TO THE CONSUMER FOR PERSONAL, NONCOMMERCIAL USE AND
that is sold, offered for sale, imported, or distributed in the State.
(2) “Packaging materials” includes:
(i) Primary, secondary, and tertiary packaging intended for the
consumer market;
(ii) Service packaging designed and intended to be filled at the point
of sale, including:
1. Carry–out bags;
2. Bulk goods bags; and
3. Take–out and home delivery food service packaging; and
(iii) Beverage containers.
(3) “Packaging materials” does not include:
(i) Any part of a package or container that is sold or supplied in
connection with:
1. A pesticide product regulated by the Federal Insecticide,
Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act under 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq. or any other applicable federal
law, rule, or regulation;
2. A federally regulated drug, medical device, biologic,
diagnostic, or dietary supplement including items intended for animals; or
– 13 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. A medical product that is required to be sterile or enclosed
in packaging with tamper–resistant seals to protect public health, including medical
products intended for animals; or
(ii) Liquefied petroleum gas containers that are designed to be
refilled.
(O) (1) “PAPER PRODUCTS” MEANS PRODUCTS MADE PRIMARILY FROM
WOOD PULP OR OTHER CELLULOSIC FIBERS.
(2) “PAPER PRODUCTS” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) BOUND BOOKS; OR
(II) PRODUCTS THAT ARE NOT ACCEPTED BY MATERIALS
RECYCLING FACILITIES OR COMPOSTING FACILITIES BECAUSE OF THE UNSAFE OR
UNSANITARY NATURE OF THE PRODUCTS.
[(f)] (I) (P) (1) “Producer” means a person that THE FOLLOWING PERSON, AS
APPLICABLE, THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLIANCE WITH A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN UNDER THIS SUBTITLE:
(i) With respect to packaging materials used to directly protect or
contain a product sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the State:
1. A. Has legal ownership of the brand of the product
under which the product is sold; or
B. Is the manufacturer of the product, if the product is sold
in packaging materials that lack identification of the brand;
2. Is the licensee of the brand or trademark under which the
product is sold, whether or not the trademark is registered in the State, if the product is
manufactured by a person other than the brand owners; or
3. Is the person that imports the product into the United
States for use in a commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale, or distributes the item
in the State, if there is no person described in items 1 and 2 of this item FOR ITEMS SOLD
IN OR WITH PACKAGING AT A PHYSICAL RETAIL LOCATION IN THE STATE:
1. IF THE ITEM IS SOLD IN OR WITH PACKAGING UNDER
THE BRAND OF THE ITEM MANUFACTURER OR IS SOLD IN PACKAGING WITHOUT
BRAND IDENTIFICATION, THE PRODUCER IS THE ITEM MANUFACTURER;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
2. IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF
THIS ITEM, THE PRODUCER IS THE PERSON THAT IS LICENSED TO MANUFACTURE
AND SELL OR OFFER FOR SALE TO CONSUMERS IN THE STATE AN ITEM WITH
PACKAGING UNDER THE BRAND OR TRADEMARK OF ANOTHER MANUFACTURER OR
PERSON;
3. IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1 AND
2 OF THIS ITEM, THE PRODUCER IS THE BRAND OWNER OF THE ITEM;
4. IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1
THROUGH 3 OF THIS ITEM WITHIN THE UNITED STATES, THE PRODUCER IS THE
PERSON THAT IMPORTS THE PRODUCT INTO THE UNITED STATES FOR USE IN A
COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISE THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES THE
ITEM IN THE STATE; OR
5. IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1
THROUGH 4 OF THIS ITEM, THE PRODUCER IS THE PERSON THAT FIRST DISTRIBUTES
THE ITEM IN OR INTO THE STATE; and
(ii) With respect to packaging materials used to ship a product to a
consumer in the State, is the person that packages and ships the product FOR ITEMS SOLD
OR DISTRIBUTED IN PACKAGING IN OR INTO THE STATE VIA E–COMMERCE, REMOTE
SALE, OR ONLINE DISTRIBUTION:
1. FOR PACKAGING USED DIRECTLY TO PROTECT OR
CONTAIN THE ITEM, THE PRODUCER OF THE PACKAGING IS A PRODUCER UNDER
ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. FOR PACKAGING USED TO SHIP THE ITEM TO A
CONSUMER, THE PRODUCER OF THE PACKAGING IS THE PERSON THAT PACKAGES
THE ITEM TO BE SHIPPED TO THE CONSUMER;
(III) FOR PACKAGING THAT IS NOT DESCRIBED IN ITEMS (I) AND
(II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE PRODUCER OF THE PACKAGING IS THE PERSON THAT
FIRST DISTRIBUTES THE ITEM IN OR INTO THE STATE;
(IV) FOR PAPER PRODUCTS THAT ARE MAGAZINES, CATALOGS,
TELEPHONE DIRECTORIES, OR SIMILAR PUBLICATIONS, THE PRODUCER IS THE
PUBLISHER;
(V) FOR A PAPER PRODUCT NOT DESCRIBED IN ITEM (IV) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH:
– 15 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. IF THE PAPER PRODUCT IS SOLD UNDER THE
MANUFACTURER’S OWN BRAND, THE PRODUCER IS THE PERSON THAT
MANUFACTURES THE PAPER PRODUCT;
2. IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF
THIS ITEM, THE PRODUCER IS THE PERSON THAT IS THE OWNER OR LICENSEE OF A
BRAND OR TRADEMARK UNDER WHICH THE PAPER PRODUCT IS USED IN A
COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISE, SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE
STATE, WHETHER OR NOT THE TRADEMARK IS REGISTERED IN THE STATE;
3. IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1 AND
2 OF THIS ITEM, THE PRODUCER IS THE BRAND OWNER OF THE PAPER PRODUCT; OR
4. IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1
THROUGH 3 OF THIS ITEM WITHIN THE UNITED STATES, THE PRODUCER IS THE
PERSON THAT IMPORTS THE PAPER PRODUCT INTO THE UNITED STATES FOR USE
IN A COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISE THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES
THE PAPER PRODUCT IN THE STATE; AND
(IV) FOR A PRODUCER IDENTIFIED IN ITEMS (I) THROUGH (III)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH THAT IS A BUSINESS OPERATED WHOLLY OR IN PART AS A
FRANCHISE, THE PRODUCER OF THE PACKAGING IS THE FRANCHISOR IF THE
FRANCHISOR HAS FRANCHISEES THAT HAVE A COMMERCIAL PRESENCE IN THE
STATE.
(2) “Producer” does not include:
(i) A local government STATE, FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCY, A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OR OTHER GOVERNMENTAL UNIT;
(ii) A nonprofit REGISTERED 501(C)(3) charitable organization OR
501(C)(4) SOCIAL WELFARE ORGANIZATION;
(iii) An entity that manufactures a drug or device authorized for sale
by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act A DE MINIMIS PRODUCER;
(iv) An entity that generated less than [$5,000,000] $1,000,000 in
gross revenue during the immediately preceding calendar year A MILL THAT USES ANY
VIRGIN WOOD FIBER IN THE PRODUCTS IT PRODUCES;
(v) An entity that sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in the
State during the immediately preceding calendar year less than 1 metric ton of packaging
materials A PAPER MILL THAT PRODUCES CONTAINER BOARD DERIVED FROM 100%
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT AND NONPOSTCONSUMER RECYCLED
CONTENT;
(vi) 1. An entity that owns or operates a restaurant, food cart, or
similar establishment that:
A. 1. Is headquartered in the State; and
B. 2. Primarily sells to members of the public food that is
generally intended to be consumed immediately and without the need for further
preparation, either on or off the premises; and
2. 3. Is not a producer of food serviceware;
(vii) An entity that owns or operates a single retail sales
establishment that:
1. Has no online sales; and
2. Is not supplied or operated as part of a franchise or a
chain; or
(viii) 1. An entity that is licensed under Title 2 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article; and
2. Generated less than $10,000,000 in gross revenue during
the immediately preceding calendar year; or
(ix) An entity A PRODUCER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION that has executed an agreement with another entity, under which the other
entity has agreed to assume responsibility BY WRITTEN CERTIFICATION under a producer
responsibility program for any packaging materials attributable to the first entity.
[(g)] (J) (Q) “Producer responsibility organization” means a nonprofit organization
that is:
(1) Exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
and
(2) Created by a group of producers to [represent the interests of producers
under] IMPLEMENT A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH this
subtitle.
(K) (R) “PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN” MEANS A PACKAGING
COVERED MATERIALS PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN SUBMITTED TO THE
– 17 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT BY A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2505 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(S) (1) “RECYCLING” MEANS THE PROCESS OF COLLECTING, SORTING,
CLEANSING, TREATING, AND CONSTITUTING MATERIALS THAT WOULD OTHERWISE
BE DISPOSED OF AND RETURNING THEM TO OR MAINTAINING THEM WITH THE
ECONOMIC MAINSTREAM IN THE FORM OF RECOVERED MATERIAL FOR NEW,
REUSED, OR RECONSTITUTED PRODUCTS THAT MEET THE QUALITY STANDARDS
NECESSARY TO BE USED IN THE MARKETPLACE.
(2) “RECYCLING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) LANDFILLING;
(II) COMBUSTION;
(III) INCINERATION;
(IV) ENERGY GENERATION;
(V) FUEL PRODUCTION; OR
(VI) ALTERNATIVE DAILY COVER OR OTHER FORMS OF USE OR
DISPOSAL WITHIN THE FOOTPRINT OF A LANDFILL.
(T) “RECYCLED COVERED MATERIAL” MEANS COVERED MATERIAL THAT IS
SENT TO A RESPONSIBLE END MARKET.
(U) “RECYCLING RATE” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF RECYCLABLE COVERED
MATERIAL, IN AGGREGATE OR BY INDIVIDUAL COVERED MATERIAL TYPE, RECYCLED
IN A CALENDAR YEAR DIVIDED BY THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF RECYCLABLE COVERED
MATERIALS SOLD OR DISTRIBUTED INTO THE STATE BY THE RELEVANT UNIT OF
MEASUREMENT.
(V) “REFILL” MEANS THE CONTINUED USE OF A COVERED MATERIAL BY A
CONSUMER THROUGH A SYSTEM THAT IS:
(1) INTENTIONALLY DESIGNED AND MARKETED FOR REPEATED
FILLING OF A COVERED MATERIAL TO REDUCE DEMAND FOR NEW PRODUCTION OF
THE COVERED MATERIAL;
(2) SUPPORTED BY ADEQUATE LOGISTICS AND INFRASTRUCTURE TO
PROVIDE CONVENIENT ACCESS FOR CONSUMERS; AND
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(3) COMPLIANT WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL
STATUTES, RULES, ORDINANCES, AND OTHER LAWS GOVERNING HEALTH AND
SAFETY.
(W) “RESPONSIBLE END MARKET” MEANS A MATERIAL MARKET IN WHICH
THE RECYCLING AND RECOVERY OF MATERIALS OR THE DISPOSAL OF
CONTAMINANTS IS CONDUCTED IN A WAY THAT:
(1) BENEFITS THE ENVIRONMENT; AND
(2) MINIMIZES RISKS TO PUBLIC HEALTH AND WORKER HEALTH AND
SAFETY.
(X) “RETURN RATE” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF REUSABLE COVERED
MATERIAL, IN AGGREGATE OR BY INDIVIDUAL COVERED MATERIALS TYPE,
COLLECTED FOR REUSE BY A PRODUCER OR SERVICE PROVIDER IN A CALENDAR
YEAR, DIVIDED BY THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF REUSABLE COVERED MATERIALS SOLD
OR DISTRIBUTED INTO THE STATE BY THE RELEVANT UNIT OF MEASUREMENT.
(Y) “REUSABLE” MEANS BEING CAPABLE OF REUSE.
(Z) “REUSE” MEANS THE RETURN OF A COVERED MATERIAL TO THE
MARKETPLACE AND THE CONTINUED USE OF THE COVERED MATERIAL BY A
PRODUCER OR SERVICE PROVIDER WHEN THE COVERED MATERIAL IS:
(1) INTENTIONALLY DESIGNED AND MARKETED TO BE USED
MULTIPLE TIMES FOR ITS ORIGINAL INTENDED PURPOSE WITHOUT A CHANGE IN
FORM;
(2) DESIGNED FOR DURABILITY AND MAINTENANCE TO EXTEND ITS
USEFUL LIFE AND REDUCE DEMAND FOR NEW PRODUCTION OF THE COVERED
MATERIAL;
(3) SUPPORTED BY ADEQUATE LOGISTICS AND INFRASTRUCTURE AT
A RETAIL LOCATION, BY A SERVICE PROVIDER, OR ON BEHALF OF OR BY A
PRODUCER, THAT PROVIDES CONVENIENT ACCESS FOR CONSUMERS; AND
(4) COMPLIANT WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL
STATUTES, RULES, ORDINANCES, AND OTHER LAWS GOVERNING HEALTH AND
SAFETY.
(AA) “REUSE RATE” MEANS THE SHARE OF UNITS OF A REUSABLE COVERED
MATERIAL SOLD OR DISTRIBUTED INTO THE STATE IN A CALENDAR YEAR THAT ARE
– 19 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
DEMONSTRATED AND DEEMED REUSABLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN APPROVED
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN.
(BB) (1) “SERVICE PROVIDER” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT PROVIDES
COVERED SERVICES FOR COVERED MATERIALS.
(2) “SERVICE PROVIDER” INCLUDES A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT
PROVIDES, CONTRACTS FOR, OR OTHERWISE ARRANGES WITH ANOTHER PARTY TO
PROVIDE COVERED SERVICES FOR COVERED MATERIALS WITHIN ITS JURISDICTION
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT PROVIDED, CONTRACTED
FOR, OR OTHERWISE ARRANGED FOR SIMILAR SERVICES BEFORE THE APPROVAL OF
THE APPLICABLE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN.
[9–2502.
(A) On or before October 1, 2023, the Department shall approve a single producer
responsibility organization to represent the interests of producers under this subtitle.]
9–2502.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THIS SUBTITLE
PROVIDE A FRAMEWORK FOR:
(1) MINIMIZING THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND HUMAN HEALTH IMPACTS
OF PACKAGING, INCLUDING BY:
(I) REDUCING THE AMOUNT OF PACKAGING, ESPECIALLY
PLASTIC PACKAGING, SOLD IN THE STATE;
(II) REDUCING PACKAGING WASTE;
(III) REDESIGNING PACKAGING TO BE RECYCLABLE,
COMPOSTABLE, AND REUSABLE; AND
(IV) REDUCING THE TOXICITY OF PACKAGING;
(2) CONSERVING RESOURCES BY INCREASING THE RECYCLING
RATES AND RECYCLED CONTENT OF COVERED PRODUCTS;
(3) MODERNIZING AND IMPROVING WASTE AND RECYCLING SYSTEMS
IN THE STATE, INCLUDING BY:
(I) FACILITATING:
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(I) THE FACILITATING THE IMPROVEMENT OF REUSE,
ORGANICS RECYCLING COMPOSTING, AND RECYCLING;
(II) THE IMPROVEMENT OF RECYCLING MARKETS;
(III) THE REDUCTION OF WASTE STIMULATING RESPONSIBLE
END MARKETS FOR COVERED MATERIALS; AND
(IV) (III) AN INCREASE IN RECYCLING RATES IMPROVING
ACCESS TO AND THE EFFICIENCY OF RECYCLING, COMPOSTING, AND REUSE
INFRASTRUCTURE, WITH SPECIAL EMPHASIS ON UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES; AND
(2) (4) REIMBURSING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS MAKING PRODUCERS
FINANCIALLY RESPONSIBLE FOR INVESTING IN THE NEEDED INFRASTRUCTURE AND
REIMBURSING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND OTHER SERVICE PROVIDERS FOR COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH TRANSPORTING, COLLECTING, AND PROCESSING PACKAGING
COVERED MATERIALS.
9–2503.
(a) There is a producer responsibility advisory council.
(b) The purpose of the advisory council is to provide advice and make
recommendations regarding establishing and implementing a producer responsibility
program in the State for packaging COVERED materials, INCLUDING ADVICE ON
DRAFTING, AMENDING, AND IMPLEMENTING PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLANS.
(c) (1) The advisory council shall consist of [up to 21 members,] MEMBERS
appointed by the Secretary, representing a broad range of interested stakeholders,
including:
(i) Representatives from the following industries or entities in the
State:
1. Local government agencies responsible for recycling
programs;
2. Recyclables and compostable materials collectors from
both the public and private sectors;
3. Recycling processors from both the public and private
sectors;
4. Organics recycling processors;
– 21 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5. Producers from the consumer goods sector;
6. Retail and small businesses; and
7. Material–oriented trade groups;
(ii) A representative from the producer responsibility organization
approved by the Department under [§ 9–2502] § 9–2505(A) of this subtitle;
(iii) Representatives of at least two nonprofit organizations in the
State with missions related to reducing waste;
(iv) (III) At least one representative of an environmental advocacy
organization;
(v) (IV) At least one representative of an advocacy organization
that advocates on behalf of overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in §
1–701 of this article; and
(vi) (V) At least two members of the public who reside in the State;
AND
(VI) THE FOLLOWING NONVOTING MEMBERS, WHO MAY NOT
SERVE AS COCHAIRS OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:
1. A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER §
9–2502(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. THE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT’S LAND AND
MATERIALS ADMINISTRATION, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE.
(2) In appointing members to the advisory council, the Secretary shall, to
the extent practicable, ensure that the membership of the advisory council represents:
(i) All geographic regions of the State;
(ii) Large and small counties and municipalities; and
(iii) The variability in how waste and recyclable and compostable
materials are collected and processed in the State.
(3) A MEMBER OF A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION MAY
NOT SERVE AS A VOTING MEMBER OR AS A COCHAIR OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(d) From among the advisory council members, the Secretary shall designate two
representatives to serve as cochairs.
(e) The Department shall provide staff for the advisory council.
(f) A member of the advisory council:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the advisory council; but
(2) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) The advisory council shall meet at the request of the Secretary.
(h) [(1)] The advisory council shall [evaluate and make recommendations,
including legislative recommendations, on how to effectively establish and implement a
producer responsibility program in the State for packaging materials.
(2) In making recommendations under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
advisory council shall include recommendations regarding the responsibilities of producers
under a producer responsibility program]:
(1) ON REQUEST BY A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION, PROVIDE ADVICE REGARDING THE DRAFTING OR AMENDING OF A
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN REQUIRED UNDER § 9–2505 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) RECEIVE AND REVIEW THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLANS
SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2505 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) RECEIVE AND REVIEW ANNUAL REPORTS SUBMITTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2507 § 9–2509 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(4) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT REGARDING
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN APPROVAL;
(5) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT AND
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS REGARDING PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN IMPLEMENTATION; AND
(6) PROVIDE WRITTEN RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN, INCLUDING ANY UPDATE OR REVISION TO AN
APPROVED PLAN, TO A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION BEFORE THE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SUBMITS THE PLAN TO THE
DEPARTMENT.
– 23 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(i) On or before December 1, 2024, the advisory council shall report its findings
and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment
and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.]
9–2504.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT AFFECT THE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE OR A
LOCAL JURISDICTION TO REGULATE THE SALE OR USE OF ANY PACKAGING
MATERIAL.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) PROHIBIT A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A SERVICE PROVIDER, OR ANY
OTHER ENTITY FROM SELLING RECYCLED MATERIALS OR COMPOST TO END
MARKETS AND RETAINING THE REVENUES FROM THOSE SALES;
(2) AFFECT THE AUTHORITY OF A PUBLICLY OR PRIVATELY OWNED
MATERIALS RECYCLING FACILITY OR ORGANICS RECYCLING COMPOSTING FACILITY
TO DETERMINE WHICH ENTITIES MAY USE THE FACILITY; OR
(3) LIMIT THE ABILITY OF LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, MATERIALS
RECYCLING FACILITIES, OR ORGANICS RECYCLING COMPOSTING FACILITIES TO
MAKE DECISIONS ON RECYCLING INFRASTRUCTURE PURCHASES, INCLUDING
PROCESSING EQUIPMENT; OR
(4) PRECLUDE THE SEPARATE ADOPTION OF A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
DEPOSIT RETURN PROGRAM IN THE STATE TO REDUCE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
POLLUTION AND PLASTIC WASTE.
9–2505.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
APPROVE A SINGLE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION TO FULFILL THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025 2026, AND EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION APPROVED UNDER
§ 9–2502(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL FILE A REGISTRATION FORM WITH THE
DEPARTMENT.
(II) THE REGISTRATION FORM SHALL INCLUDE:
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
1. A LIST OF THE PRODUCERS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION;
2. A LIST OF THE BRANDS OF EACH PRODUCER
PARTICIPATING IN THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION;
3. A LIST OF THE COVERED MATERIALS OF EACH
PRODUCER PARTICIPATING IN THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION;
AND
4. THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND CONTACT INFORMATION
OF A PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR ENSURING THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION’S AND THE MEMBER PRODUCERS’ COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE.
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AT AT
THE TIME OF FILING THE REGISTRATION FORM, THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION SHALL PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT AN ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE,
AS SET BY THE DEPARTMENT, IN AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE COSTS OF
RECORD KEEPING, NOT TO EXCEED $1,000:
1. IN EACH YEAR:
A. THE COSTS OF RECORD KEEPING UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, NOT TO EXCEED $1,000; AND
B. THE COSTS OF DEVELOPING AND UPDATING THE LIST
REQUIRED UNDER § 9–2508 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
2. IN 2026 ONLY AS NECESSARY, THE COSTS OF
DEVELOPING AND IMPLEMENTING REGULATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2511
OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
3. IN 2028 AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE COSTS OF
REGISTERING SERVICE PROVIDERS UNDER § 9–2507 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) BEFORE ESTABLISHING AND COLLECTING AN ANNUAL
REGISTRATION FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) PUBLISH A PROPOSED FEE ON ITS WEBSITE; AND
(II) ALLOW 90 CALENDAR DAYS FOR PUBLIC COMMENT.
– 25 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) (2) (I) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2031 2033, A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION MAY REQUEST THAT THE DEPARTMENT DESIGNATE THE
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION AS AN ADDITIONAL PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DESIGNATE A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION AS AN ADDITIONAL PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION IF
THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES, IN COORDINATION WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–2503 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THAT THE DESIGNATION OF THE
ADDITIONAL PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION IS NECESSARY TO:
1. INCREASE RECYCLING RATES; OR
2. IMPROVE RECYCLING SERVICES FOR A SPECIFIC
TYPE OF PACKAGING COVERED MATERIAL.
(III) IF THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES THE DESIGNATION OF AN
ADDITIONAL PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL:
1. NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER BEING APPROVED
BY THE DEPARTMENT AND ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, FILE A
REGISTRATION FORM WITH THE DEPARTMENT CONTAINING THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND PAY THE ANNUAL
REGISTRATION FEE DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
2. COORDINATE WITH THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO ENSURE THAT:
A. RECYCLING SERVICES FOR RESIDENTS OF THE STATE
ARE PROVIDED IN A SEAMLESS MANNER; AND
B. PUBLIC OUTREACH, EDUCATION, AND
COMMUNICATION ARE PROVIDED IN A CONSISTENT MANNER.
(IV) THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND ANY ADDITIONAL
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS DESIGNATED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH MAY CREATE A REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATION TO REPRESENT THE
PARTICIPATING PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(3) (I) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION AND ANY REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, A PRODUCER OR GROUP OF PRODUCERS MAY DEVELOP AND
OPERATE AN ALTERNATIVE COLLECTION PROGRAM TO COLLECT AND MANAGE A
TYPE OR TYPES OF COVERED MATERIAL SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTED
FOR SALE IN OR INTO THE STATE BY THE PRODUCER OR PRODUCERS.
(II) A PRODUCER THAT MANAGES A TYPE OF COVERED
MATERIAL UNDER AN APPROVED ALTERNATIVE COLLECTION PROGRAM THROUGH
REUSE, RECYCLING, OR COMPOSTING MAY WHOLLY OR IN PART OFFSET THE
PRODUCER’S PAYMENT OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(III) AN ALTERNATIVE COLLECTION PROGRAM SHALL IMPROVE
AND PROVIDE A DEDICATED COLLECTION PROGRAM FOR THE APPLICABLE
COVERED MATERIAL.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2027 JULY 1, 2028, AND EVERY 5 YEARS
THEREAFTER, EACH PRODUCER SHALL, INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION, SUBMIT A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN TO
THE DEPARTMENT FOR REVIEW AND APPROVAL.
(2) BEFORE SUBMITTING THE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT, A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION SHALL:
(I) CONSULT WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–2503 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) CONSIDER THE WRITTEN RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL AND RESPOND IN WRITING TO THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ON OR AFTER A DATE ESTABLISHED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–2509 § 9–2511 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PRODUCER MAY NOT
SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTE, OR IMPORT FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION
PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS FOR USE IN THE STATE UNLESS THE PRODUCER,
INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION, HAS
AN APPROVED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN ON FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) A PRODUCER IS NOT REQUIRED TO SUBMIT A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT, INDIVIDUALLY OR AS PART OF A
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION, IF ANOTHER PERSON HAS AGREED TO
ASSUME RESPONSIBILITY UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR ANY PACKAGING COVERED
– 27 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
MATERIAL SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTED IN OR INTO THE STATE BY
THAT PRODUCER.
(C) (1) A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN SHALL:
(1) (I) IDENTIFY THE PRODUCERS COVERED BY THE PLAN,
INCLUDING THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR EACH PARTICIPATING PRODUCER
AND THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION;
(2) (II) IDENTIFY EACH BRAND OF PACKAGING COVERED
MATERIALS COVERED BY THE PLAN;
(3) (III) REQUIRE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION, ACHIEVEMENT WITHIN 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE FIRST
VERSION OF THE PLAN IS APPROVED AND ESTABLISH THE FOLLOWING
PERFORMANCE GOALS, AS RELEVANT AND AS APPROPRIATE, FOR EACH PACKAGING
COVERED MATERIAL TYPE:
(I) 1. POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT GOALS;
(II) RECYCLABILITY AND RECYCLING RATE GOALS;
(III) REUSE GOALS;
(IV) PACKAGING REDUCTION GOALS;
(V) COMPOST ACCESS OR COMPOST RATE GOALS, IF
APPLICABLE AND TECHNOLOGICALLY AND ENVIRONMENTALLY FEASIBLE;
(VI) CONTAMINATION REDUCTION RATE GOALS; RECYCLING
RATES;
2. COMPOSTING RATES;
3. REUSE RATES;
4. RETURN RATES;
5. THE PERCENTAGE OF COVERED MATERIALS TO BE
WASTE REDUCED;
6. THE PERCENTAGE OF POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED
CONTENT THAT COVERED MATERIALS ARE REQUIRED TO CONTAIN, INCLUDING THE
OVERALL PERCENTAGE FOR ALL COVERED MATERIALS AS APPLICABLE, AND NOT
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
INCLUDING COMPOSTABLE MATERIALS THAT CANNOT CONTAIN POSTCONSUMER
RECYCLED CONTENT DUE TO UNIQUE CHEMICAL OR PHYSICAL PROPERTIES OR
HEALTH AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS THAT PROHIBIT THE INTRODUCTION OF
POSTCONSUMER RECYCLED CONTENT; AND
(VII) 7. GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION GOALS; AND
(VIII) ANY OTHER GOAL THAT REDUCES PACKAGING MATERIAL
WASTE AND IS JUSTIFIED IN THE PLAN;
(4) REQUIRE EACH PARTICIPATING PRODUCER TO REDUCE
PACKAGING MATERIAL WASTE TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE, AND BY
NOT LESS THAN 25%, WITHIN 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE FIRST
VERSION OF THE PLAN IS APPROVED;
(5) (IV) DESCRIBE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, THE FINANCING METHOD THAT WILL BE USED TO IMPLEMENT THE PLAN;
(V) DESCRIBE HOW, FOR EACH COVERED MATERIAL TYPE, THE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION WILL MEASURE RECYCLING, WASTE
REDUCTION, REUSE, COMPOSTING, AND THE INCLUSION OF POSTCONSUMER
RECYCLED CONTENT;
(6) (VI) DESCRIBE HOW THE PERFORMANCE GOALS ESTABLISHED
UNDER ITEM (3) (III) OF THIS SUBSECTION PARAGRAPH WILL BE MET OR EXCEEDED;
(VII) INCLUDE PROPOSALS FOR EXEMPTIONS FROM
PERFORMANCE TARGETS AND STATEWIDE REQUIREMENTS FOR COVERED
MATERIALS THAT CANNOT BE WASTE REDUCED OR MADE REUSABLE, RECYCLABLE,
OR COMPOSTABLE DUE TO FEDERAL OR STATE HEALTH AND SAFETY
REQUIREMENTS, IDENTIFYING THE SPECIFIC FEDERAL OR STATE REQUIREMENT
AND THEIR IMPACT ON THE COVERED MATERIALS;
(VIII) DESCRIBE INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENTS, INCLUDING
GOALS AND OUTCOMES AND A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE PROCESS TO OFFER AND
SELECT OPPORTUNITIES WILL BE CONDUCTED IN AN OPEN, COMPETITIVE, AND FAIR
MANNER, HOW IT WILL ADDRESS GAPS IN THE SYSTEM NOT MET BY SERVICE
PROVIDERS, AND THE POTENTIAL FINANCIAL AND LEGAL INSTRUMENTS TO BE
USED;
(IX) EXPLAIN HOW THE PROGRAM WILL BE PAID FOR BY THE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION THROUGH FEES FROM PRODUCERS,
WITHOUT ANY NEW OR ADDITIONAL CONSUMER–FACING FEE TO MEMBERS OF THE
PUBLIC, BUSINESSES, SERVICE PROVIDERS, THE STATE OR ANY POLITICAL
– 29 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SUBDIVISIONS, OR ANY OTHER PERSON WHO IS NOT A PRODUCER, UNLESS THE FEE
IS:
1. A DEPOSIT MADE IN CONNECTION WITH A PRODUCT’S
REFILL, REUSE, OR RECYCLING THAT CAN BE REDEEMED BY A CONSUMER; OR
2. A CHARGE FOR SERVICE BY A SERVICE PROVIDER,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE SERVICE PROVIDER IS REGISTERED;
(X) DESCRIBE ACTIVITIES TO BE UNDERTAKEN BY THE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION DURING EACH YEAR TO:
1. MINIMIZE THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS AND
HUMAN HEALTH IMPACTS OF COVERED MATERIALS, INCLUDING ASSESSING EACH
COVERED MATERIAL’S GENERATION OF HAZARDOUS WASTE, GENERATION OF
GREENHOUSE GASES, ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE IMPACTS, PUBLIC HEALTH
IMPACTS, AND OTHER IMPACTS;
2. FOSTER THE IMPROVED DESIGN OF COVERED
MATERIALS;
3. PROVIDE FUNDING TO EXPAND AND INCREASE THE
CONVENIENCE OF WASTE REDUCTION, REUSE, COLLECTION, RECYCLING, AND
COMPOSTING SERVICES TO COVERED ENTITIES;
4. PROVIDE FOR REIMBURSEMENT RATES UNDER
SUBSECTION (E)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION TO SERVICE PROVIDERS FOR STATEWIDE
COVERAGE OF COVERED SERVICES AT AN OPTIMAL LEVEL OF CONVENIENCE AND
SERVICE FOR APPLICABLE COVERED MATERIALS ON THE LIST ESTABLISHED UNDER
§ 9–2508 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
5. MONITOR TO ENSURE THAT POSTCONSUMER
MATERIALS ARE DELIVERED TO RESPONSIBLE END MARKETS;
(XI) INCLUDE PERFORMANCE STANDARDS FOR SERVICE
PROVIDERS AS APPLICABLE TO THE SERVICE PROVIDED, INCLUDING:
1. REQUIREMENTS THAT SERVICE PROVIDERS MUST
ACCEPT ALL REQUIRED COVERED MATERIALS ON THE LIST ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–2508 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. LABOR STANDARDS AND SAFETY PRACTICES,
INCLUDING SAFETY PROGRAMS, HEALTH BENEFITS, AND LIVING WAGES;
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(XII) DESCRIBE HOW THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION WILL TREAT AND PROTECT NONPUBLIC DATA SUBMITTED BY
SERVICE PROVIDERS;
(XIII) INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION WILL PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO
SERVICE PROVIDERS IN ORDER TO ASSIST THEM IN DELIVERING COVERED
MATERIALS TO RESPONSIBLE END MARKETS;
(7) (XIV) DESCRIBE HOW STAKEHOLDER COMMENTS WERE
CONSIDERED IN THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE PLAN;
(8) (XV) DESCRIBE HOW STAFFING AND ADMINISTERING THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PLAN WILL BE HANDLED;
(9) DESCRIBE THE STRATEGY FOR REDUCING PACKAGING
MATERIALS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING HOW PRODUCERS PARTICIPATING IN A PLAN
WILL WORK TOGETHER TO REDUCE PACKAGING THROUGH PRODUCT DESIGN AND
PROGRAM INNOVATIONS;
(10) (XVI) DESCRIBE THE ACTIONS TAKEN OR THAT WILL BE TAKEN
FOR PUBLIC OUTREACH, EDUCATION, AND COMMUNICATION, TAKING INTO
ACCOUNT THAT PUBLIC OUTREACH, EDUCATION, AND COMMUNICATION SHALL:
(I) 1. PROMOTE THE RESPONSIBLE END–OF–LIFE
MANAGEMENT OF PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS;
(II) 2. PROVIDE INFORMATION ON HOW TO PREVENT LITTER
OF PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS;
(III) 3. PROVIDE RECYCLING AND ORGANICS RECYCLING
COMPOSTING INSTRUCTIONS THAT ARE, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE:
1. A. CONSISTENT STATEWIDE, TAKING INTO ACCOUNT
DIFFERENCES AMONG LOCAL LAWS AND PROCESSING CAPABILITIES;
2. B. EASY TO UNDERSTAND; AND
3. C. EASILY ACCESSIBLE; AND
(IV) 4. PROVIDE FOR OUTREACH AND EDUCATION THAT ARE:
– 31 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. A. DESIGNED TO ACHIEVE PACKAGING MATERIALS
MANAGEMENT GOALS AND REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING THE PREVENTION OF
CONTAMINATION OF PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS;
2. B. COORDINATED ACROSS PROGRAMS TO AVOID
CONFUSION FOR CONSUMERS; AND
3. C. DEVELOPED IN CONSULTATION WITH LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS;
(11) (XVII) DESCRIBE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF
THIS SECTION, THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING THAT WILL BE USED FOR IMPROVING
REUSE, ORGANICS RECYCLING COMPOSTING, AND RECYCLING IN THE STATE;
(12) (XVIII) DESCRIBE THE PROCESS BY WHICH A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SERVICE PROVIDER MAY REQUEST REIMBURSEMENT FOR COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH TRANSPORTING, COLLECTING, AND PROCESSING PACKAGING
COVERED MATERIALS THAT ARE IDENTIFIED IN THE PLAN, INCLUDING:
(I) 1. THE PROCESS BY WHICH THE REQUEST WILL BE
REVIEWED;
(II) 2. THE PROCESS FOR APPROVING OR DENYING A
REQUEST FOR REIMBURSEMENT;
(III) 3. THE SCHEDULE FOR PROVIDING REIMBURSEMENT
THAT INCLUDES REIMBURSEMENT ON AT LEAST A QUARTERLY BASIS; AND
(IV) 4. THE PROCESS FOR PROVIDING REIMBURSEMENT FOR
MULTIPLE BRANDS OF PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS; AND
5. THE PROCESS FOR RESOLVING, THROUGH
ARBITRATION, DISPUTES THAT ARISE BETWEEN THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION AND A SERVICE PROVIDER REGARDING THE DETERMINATION OF
REIMBURSEMENT RATES AND PAYMENT OF REIMBURSEMENTS;
(13) (XIX) (I) 1. PROVIDE THE WRITTEN RECOMMENDATIONS
FROM THE ADVISORY COUNCIL PROVIDED UNDER § 9–2503 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND
THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION’S WRITTEN RESPONSE TO THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL; AND
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(II) 2. DESCRIBE HOW THE WRITTEN RECOMMENDATIONS
FROM THE ADVISORY COUNCIL WERE CONSIDERED AND ADDRESSED IN THE
DEVELOPMENT OF THE PLAN; AND
(14) (XX) INCLUDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT IS REQUIRED BY
THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PERFORMANCE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO:
(I) PRODUCTS PACKAGED AT ESTABLISHMENTS UNDER
MANDATORY INSPECTION BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE’S FOOD
SAFETY AND INSPECTION SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL MEAT
INSPECTION ACT, THE FEDERAL POULTRY PRODUCTS INSPECTION ACT, THE
FEDERAL EGG PRODUCTS INSPECTION ACT, OR U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURAL OR U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION REGULATIONS
RELATED TO CHEESE PACKAGING;
(II) PRODUCTS PACKAGED AT FACILITIES REGULATED UNDER
STATE MEAT AND DAIRY INSPECTION LAWS; OR
(III) FOR A PERIOD OF 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
FIRST VERSION OF THE PLAN IS APPROVED AND ESTABLISHED, WITH AN OPTIONAL
EXTENSION OF 5 YEARS CONTINGENT ON THE DEVELOPMENT OF RECYCLING,
INCLUDING ORGANICS RECYCLING, INFRASTRUCTURE CAPABLE OF HANDLING
PATHOGEN–CONTAMINATED PACKAGING IN A SAFE AND EFFECTIVE MANNER,
CHEESE, MEAT, AND POULTRY PREPARED AND PACKAGED AT RETAIL LOCATIONS
SUCH AS GROCERY STORES, BUTCHER SHOPS, OR ONLINE RETAILERS.
(D) BASED ON THE RESULTS OF THE MOST RECENT STATEWIDE RECYCLING
NEEDS ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED UNDER CHAPTER 465 OF THE ACTS OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2023 OR § 9–1702.2 OF THIS TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
COORDINATION WITH A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION AND VIA THE
APPROVAL OF PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLANS, SHALL ESTABLISH
PERFORMANCE GOALS FOR EACH PACKAGING COVERED MATERIAL TYPE USING A
BASELINE YEAR THAT IS INFORMED BY THE STATEWIDE RECYCLING NEEDS
ASSESSMENT, INCLUDING ESTABLISHING RECYCLING RATE GOALS FOR EACH
PACKAGING COVERED MATERIAL TYPE, AT 5–, 10–, AND 15–YEAR INTERVALS.
(E) (1) THE FINANCING METHOD THAT WILL BE USED BY A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION TO IMPLEMENT A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PLAN SHALL:
– 33 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) PROVIDE THE METHOD FOR EITHER DIRECT INVESTMENTS
OR REIMBURSEMENTS FOR IMPROVING INFRASTRUCTURE FOR REUSE, ORGANICS
RECYCLING COMPOSTING, AND RECYCLING IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(C)(11) (C)(1)(XVII) OF THIS SECTION, WITH PRIORITY GIVEN TO THE IMPROVEMENT
OF EXISTING INFRASTRUCTURE;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
PROVIDE:
1. PROVIDE A METHODOLOGY FOR REIMBURSEMENT
RATES FOR COVERED SERVICES FOR COVERED MATERIALS, EXCLUSIVE OF EXEMPT
MATERIALS AND PRODUCERS;
2. INCORPORATE RELEVANT COST INFORMATION
IDENTIFIED BY THE MOST RECENT NEEDS ASSESSMENT PERFORMED UNDER
CHAPTER 465 OF THE ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR § 9–1702.2 OF THIS
TITLE;
3. BE UPDATED ANNUALLY; AND
4. ESTABLISH REIMBURSEMENT RATES EQUIVALENT
TO:
A. AT LEAST 50% OF THE COST PER TON ON OR BEFORE
JULY 1, 2028;
B. AT LEAST 75% OF THE COST PER TON ON OR BEFORE
JULY 1, 2029; AND
C. AT LEAST 90% OF THE COST PER TON ON OR BEFORE
JULY 1, 2030, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER A REASONABLE ANNUAL RATE PER TON
OF RECYCLED OR COMPOSTED PACKAGING MATERIALS FOR REIMBURSING LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS FOR COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH:
1. UP TO 50% OF THE COST OF COLLECTING PACKAGING
MATERIALS THAT ARE IDENTIFIED IN THE PLAN;
2. TRANSPORTING RECYCLABLE OR COMPOSTABLE
PACKAGING MATERIALS TO A MATERIALS RECYCLING FACILITY OR AN ORGANICS
RECYCLING FACILITY;
3. PROCESSING PACKAGING MATERIALS, INCLUDING
REMOVING CONTAMINATION; AND
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
4. CONVERTING PACKAGING MATERIALS THAT ARE
DIVERTED TO BE RECYCLED OR COMPOSTED INTO COMMODITY MATERIALS;
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ESTABLISH A FEE STRUCTURE FOR PARTICIPATING PRODUCERS THAT IS SET IN A
MANNER TO COVER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH:
1. IMPLEMENTING THE PLAN, INCLUDING THE
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION;
2. REIMBURSING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS OR SERVICE
PROVIDERS FOR COSTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH;
3. THE ADMINISTRATION, REVIEW, OVERSIGHT, AND
ENFORCEMENT OF THE PLAN BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
4. IMPLEMENTING THE STRATEGY IN THE PLAN FOR
REDUCING PACKAGING MATERIALS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)(9) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
5. IMPLEMENTING THE STRATEGY IN THE PLAN FOR
IMPROVING REUSE, ORGANICS RECYCLING COMPOSTING, AND RECYCLING IN THE
STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)(11) (C)(1)(XVII) OF THIS SECTION;
(IV) 1. DESCRIBE THE INCENTIVES TO ENCOURAGE
PARTICIPATING PRODUCERS TO ENGAGE IN WASTE REDUCTION AND RECYCLING
ACTIVITIES; AND
2. DESCRIBE THE DISINCENTIVES TO DISCOURAGE
DESIGNS OR PRACTICES THAT INCREASE THE COST OF MANAGING PACKAGING
MATERIALS;
(V) BE EVALUATED BY AN INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDITOR,
AS DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT, TO ENSURE THAT THE COSTS OF
IMPLEMENTING THE PLAN ARE COVERED; AND
(VI) MEET ANY OTHER REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT BY REGULATION.
(2) THE REIMBURSEMENT RATE ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
– 35 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) BASED ON THE FOLLOWING, AS APPLICABLE BY SERVICE
PROVIDED:
1. THE POPULATION SIZE OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION;
2. THE DISTANCE TO THE RELEVANT MATERIALS
RECYCLING FACILITY OR ORGANICS RECYCLING FACILITY;
3. THE COMMODITY VALUE OF RECYCLED PACKAGING
MATERIALS; AND
4. ANY SOCIOECONOMIC OR GEOGRAPHIC FACTOR, AS
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) DISCOUNTED EQUIVALENT TO THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL
VOLUME OF PACKAGING MATERIALS SOLD IN THE STATE BY PERSONS THAT ARE
EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE BE BASED ON THE
FOLLOWING, AS APPLICABLE BY SERVICE PROVIDED:
(I) A FIXED AMOUNT FOR EACH TON OF COVERED MATERIAL
COLLECTED BY A SERVICE PROVIDER THAT REFLECTS CONDITIONS AFFECTING
COLLECTION, RECYCLING, AND COMPOSTING COSTS IN THE REGION OR
JURISDICTION WHERE THE SERVICES WERE PROVIDED, INCLUDING:
1. THE NUMBER AND SIZE OF COVERED ENTITIES;
2. POPULATION DENSITY;
3. COLLECTION METHODS EMPLOYED;
4. THE DISTANCE TRAVELED TO CONSOLIDATION OR
TRANSFER FACILITIES, MATERIALS RECYCLING FACILITIES, REUSE FACILITIES,
COMPOSTING FACILITIES, OR RESPONSIBLE END MARKETS;
5. OTHER FACTORS THAT MAY CONTRIBUTE TO
REGIONAL OR JURISDICTIONAL COST DIFFERENCES;
6. THE PROPORTION OF COVERED COMPOSTABLE
MATERIALS WITHIN ALL SOURCE–SEPARATED COMPOSTABLE MATERIALS
COLLECTED OR MANAGED THROUGH COMPOSTING; AND
7. THE GENERAL QUALITY OF COVERED MATERIALS
RECYCLED OR COMPSTED BY A SERVICE PROVIDER;
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(II) A FIXED AMOUNT FOR EACH TON OF COVERED MATERIAL
RECYCLED OR COMPOSTED BY A SERVICE PROVIDER IN THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR
YEAR BASED ON:
1. THE AVERAGE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
TRANSPORTATION AND PROCESSING, FROM A CENTRAL LOCATION WITHIN A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OF COLLECTED COVERED MATERIAL FROM THE POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION TO A MATERIALS RECYCLING FACILITY OR COMPOSTING FACILITY;
2. THE PROCESSING OF, AND REMOVAL OF
CONTAMINATION FROM, COVERED MATERIALS BY A MATERIALS RECYCLING
FACILITY OR COMPOSTING FACILITY;
3. THE RECYCLING OR COMPOSTING OF COVERED
MATERIALS LESS THE AVERAGE FAIR MARKET VALUE FOR THAT COVERED
MATERIAL BASED ON THE MARKET INDICES FOR THE REGION, UPDATED MONTHLY;
4. COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE MANAGEMENT OF
CONTAMINATED MATERIALS REMOVED FROM THE COLLECTED COVERED
MATERIALS; AND
5. THE PROPORTION OF COVERED COMPOSTABLE
MATERIALS WITHIN ALL SOURCE–SEPARATED COMPOSTABLE MATERIALS
COLLECTED OR MANAGED THROUGH COMPOSTING;
(III) AN ADDITIONAL FIXED AMOUNT PER TON, IN EXCESS OF THE
RATE PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, FOR EACH
COVERED MATERIAL TYPE NOT LISTED UNDER § 9–2508 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT
WAS RECYCLED OR COMPOSTED BY A SERVICE PROVIDER IN THE PREVIOUS
CALENDAR YEAR, LESS THE AVERAGE FAIR MARKET VALUE FOR THE COVERED
MATERIAL BASED ON THE MARKET INDICES FOR THE REGION, UPDATED MONTHLY;
(IV) A FIXED AMOUNT FOR EACH TON OF MIXED RECYCLING
THAT IS MANAGED THROUGH A PROCESS THAT INCLUDES PERCENTAGES OF
COVERED MATERIALS LISTED UNDER § 9–2508 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND ADDITIONAL
COVERED MATERIALS, PRORATED FOR THE VALUES IN ITEMS 1 AND 2 OF
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, BASED ON THE MOST RECENT WASTE
CHARACTERIZATION FOR MIXED RECYCLING TON AVERAGES;
(V) A FIXED AMOUNT, BASED ON POPULATION SERVED, FOR
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF SERVICE PROVIDERS, INCLUDING EDUCATION, PUBLIC
AWARENESS CAMPAIGNS, AND OUTREACH PROGRAM COSTS AS APPLICABLE; AND
– 37 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(VI) A FIXED AMOUNT FOR THE COST OF MANAGING COVERED
MATERIALS CAPABLE OF REFILL OR REUSABLE COVERED MATERIALS AND FOR THE
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH COLLECTION, CLEANING, SANITATION, DISTRIBUTION,
AND MANAGEMENT OF CONTAMINATION.
(3) (I) BEFORE ESTABLISHING THE FEE STRUCTURE FOR
PARTICIPATING PRODUCERS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL:
1. PUBLISH A PROPOSED FEE ON ITS WEBSITE; AND
2. ALLOW 90 CALENDAR DAYS FOR PUBLIC COMMENT.
(II) THE FEE STRUCTURE ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE VARIABLE BASED ON:
1. COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH TRANSPORTING,
COLLECTING, AND PROCESSING PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS;
2. AN ECO–MODULATION OF FEES, INCLUDING
ESTABLISHING:
A. A HIGHER FEE FOR PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS
WITH LOW RECYCLABILITY OR NOT LISTED UNDER § 9–2508 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR
WITH LOW RECYCLED CONTENT; AND
B. A DISCOUNTED FEE FOR PACKAGING COVERED
MATERIALS WITH HIGH RECYCLABILITY OR LISTED UNDER § 9–2508 OF THIS
SUBTITLE OR WITH HIGH RECYCLED CONTENT; AND
3. ANY OTHER FACTOR, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(4) (I) A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL
RETAIN ANY FEE COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN ITS OWN ACCOUNT.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUEST AT ANY TIME AN AUDIT OF
THE FINANCIAL RECORDS OF A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION.
(5) (I) A SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL RETAIN ALL REVENUE FROM
THE SALE OF COVERED MATERIALS.
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(II) NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CONSTRUED TO
RESTRICT A SERVICE PROVIDER FROM CHARGING A FEE FOR COVERED SERVICES OF
COVERED MATERIALS TO THE EXTENT THAT REIMBURSEMENT FROM A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION DOES NOT COVER ALL COSTS OF SERVICES,
INCLUDING:
1. CONTINUED INVESTMENT AND INNOVATION IN
OPERATIONS;
2. OPERATING PROFITS; AND
3. RETURNS ON INVESTMENTS REQUIRED BY A SERVICE
PROVIDER TO PROVIDE SUSTAINABILITY OF THE SERVICES.
(F) THE FUNDING THAT WILL BE USED FOR IMPROVING REUSE, ORGANICS
RECYCLING COMPOSTING, AND RECYCLING SHALL INCLUDE INVESTMENT IN
MARKET DEVELOPMENT AND EXISTING AND FUTURE REUSE, ORGANICS RECYCLING
COMPOSTING, AND RECYCLING INFRASTRUCTURE, GIVING PRIORITY TO
INVESTMENT IN EXISTING INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING:
(1) INSTALLING OR UPGRADING EQUIPMENT TO IMPROVE THE
SORTING OF PACKAGING MATERIALS AT EXISTING SORTING AND PROCESSING
FACILITIES;
(2) MITIGATING THE IMPACTS OF PACKAGING MATERIALS ON OTHER
COMMODITIES AT EXISTING SORTING AND PROCESSING FACILITIES; AND
(3) CAPITAL EXPENDITURES FOR NEW TECHNOLOGY, EQUIPMENT,
AND FACILITIES, BASED ON THE RESULTS OF THE MOST RECENT STATEWIDE
RECYCLING NEEDS ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED UNDER CHAPTER 465 OF THE ACTS
OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2023 OR § 9–1702.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW:
(1) THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE WORK PRODUCT OF THE INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDITOR
DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO EVALUATE THE FINANCING COMPONENT OF
THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1)(V) OF THIS
SECTION.
– 39 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(H) (1) WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A PROPOSED PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE, APPROVE WITH
CONDITIONS, OR REJECT THE PLAN.
(2) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER:
(I) THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN COMPLIES WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING WHETHER THE FINANCING
METHOD WILL COVER THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THE PLAN; AND
(II) THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION ENGAGED
SUFFICIENTLY WITH STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, IN
DEVELOPING THE PLAN.
(3) NOT LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN IS INITIALLY APPROVED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ENTITY
THAT SUBMITTED THE PLAN SHALL PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT’S COST OF REVIEWING THE PLAN; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT’S ESTIMATED COSTS OF
ADMINISTERING, OVERSEEING, AND ENFORCING THE PLAN BETWEEN THE INITIAL
DATE OF APPROVAL AND THE DATE OF THE INITIAL ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED
UNDER § 9–2507 § 9–2509 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(I) IMPLEMENTATION OF AN APPROVED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN
SHALL BEGIN NOT LATER THAN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE THE PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN IS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(J) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN APPROVED PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN SHALL EXPIRE AFTER 5 YEARS.
(2) A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN MAY CONTINUE AFTER 5
YEARS IF IT IS RENEGOTIATED, RENEWED, OR AMENDED AND APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY RESCIND APPROVAL OF A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN AT ANY TIME FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(4) IF THE DEPARTMENT RESCINDS AN APPROVAL OF A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
PRODUCER OR, IF APPLICABLE, THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
MAY AMEND THE PLAN AND SUBMIT IT TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(5) IF, BASED ON THE ANNUAL REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER § 9–2507
§ 9–2509 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE PERFORMANCE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(3) (C)(1)(III) OF THIS SECTION HAVE NOT BEEN ACHIEVED, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) REQUIRE THAT A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION AMEND THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN;
AND
(II) IMPOSE AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY ON A PRODUCER OR
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2510 §
9–2512 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(6) IF THE DEPARTMENT REQUIRES A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION TO AMEND A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN
UNDER PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PRODUCER OR PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL COVER THE COST OF THE DEPARTMENT’S
REVIEW AND SUPPLEMENTAL WORK ON THE PLAN.
9–2506.
(A) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION, AS ESTABLISHED IN AN APPROVED PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN ON FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT, AND ANY OTHER
REQUIREMENT ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICE
PROVIDER MAY REQUEST REIMBURSEMENT FROM A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION FOR COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH COLLECTING, TRANSPORTING, AND
PROCESSING PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS THAT ARE IDENTIFIED UNDER THE
PLAN, INCLUDING COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH RECYCLING SERVICES FOR PUBLIC
PLACES AND PUBLIC HOUSING COVERED ENTITIES.
(B) (1) IF MULTIPLE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS
REGISTER APPROVED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLANS WITH THE DEPARTMENT
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATIONS SHALL COORDINATE REIMBURSEMENT REQUESTED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
– 41 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) MULTIPLE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS MAY
ESTABLISH A THIRD–PARTY ENTITY TO COORDINATE REIMBURSEMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT AUTHORIZE A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICE
PROVIDER TO REQUEST REIMBURSEMENT FROM A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION FOR COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH COMPOSTING MATERIALS THAT ARE
NOT PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS, INCLUDING FOOD WASTE AND OTHER
ORGANIC MATERIALS.
9–2507.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER,
A SERVICE PROVIDER SEEKING REIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER
AN APPROVED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN UNDER § 9–2505 OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL REGISTER WITH THE DEPARTMENT BY SUBMITTING THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(1) THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR AN INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTING
THE SERVICE PROVIDER;
(2) THE ADDRESS OF THE SERVICE PROVIDER; AND
(3) (I) IF APPLICABLE TO THE SERVICES PROVIDED, A REPORT OF
THE TOTAL AMOUNT BILLED FOR COLLECTION FOR COVERED ENTITIES,
PROCESSING SERVICES, AND TRANSFER STATION OPERATIONS PROVIDED DURING
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(II) IF POSSIBLE, VALUES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE DISAGGREGATED BY WHETHER THE VALUE IS FOR
COLLECTION, PROCESSING, OR TRANSFER.
(B) A SERVICE PROVIDER RECEIVING REIMBURSEMENT OR FUNDING
UNDER AN APPROVED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN SHALL:
(1) AS APPLICABLE TO THE SERVICES OFFERED BY AND SERVICE
AREA OF THE SERVICE PROVIDER, PROVIDE COVERED SERVICES FOR:
(I) COVERED MATERIALS INCLUDED ON THE LISTS
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–2508 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) A REFILL SYSTEM; OR
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(III) REUSABLE COVERED MATERIALS;
(2) REGISTER WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION;
(3) SUBMIT INVOICES TO THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION FOR REIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES RENDERED, AS PROVIDED
UNDER AN APPROVED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN;
(4) MEET PERFORMANCE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN AN
APPROVED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN UNDER § 9–2505 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(5) ENSURE THAT COVERED MATERIALS ARE SENT TO RESPONSIBLE
END MARKETS;
(6) PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION TO THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION ON THE AMOUNTS, COVERED MATERIAL TYPES, AND WEIGHTS OF
COVERED MATERIALS BY COVERED SERVICE METHOD;
(7) DISPLAY THE SERVICE PROVIDER’S PRICE, LESS THE
REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION AS
DETERMINED UNDER § 9–2505 OF THIS SUBTITLE WHEN INVOICING CUSTOMERS;
AND
(8) OTHERWISE COMPLY WITH ALL OTHER APPLICABLE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) A SERVICE PROVIDER MAY DESIGNATE AS CONFIDENTIAL ANY
PROPRIETARY INFORMATION PROVIDED TO:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(II) A PERSON DETERMINING REIMBURSEMENT RATES UNDER §
9–2505 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) INFORMATION DESIGNATED AS CONFIDENTIAL UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER TITLE 4 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE (THE MARYLAND PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT), EXCEPT THAT
THE INFORMATION MAY BE DISCLOSED AS SUMMARIZED OR AGGREGATED DATA IF
DOING SO DOES NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY DISCLOSE THE PROPRIETARY
INFORMATION OF ANY SPECIFIC FACILITY.
9–2508.
– 43 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP
A STATEWIDE LIST OF COVERED MATERIALS DETERMINED TO BE RECYCLABLE OR
COMPOSTABLE THROUGH CURBSIDE RECYCLING PROGRAMS.
(2) COVERED MATERIALS IN THE LIST DEVELOPED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE COLLECTED:
(I) AT AN OPTIMAL LEVEL OF SERVICE AND CONVENIENCE FOR
COVERED ENTITIES; AND
(II) AT A MINIMUM, WHEREVER COLLECTION SERVICES FOR
MIXED MUNICIPAL SOLID WASTE ARE AVAILABLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP THE LIST UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION IN CONSULTATION WITH:
(1) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL;
(2) PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS;
(3) SERVICE PROVIDERS;
(4) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS; AND
(5) OTHER INTERESTED PARTIES.
(C) IN DEVELOPING THE LIST UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(1) CURRENT AVAILABILITY OF RECYCLING AND COMPOSTING
COLLECTION SERVICES;
(2) RECYCLING AND COMPOSTING PROCESSING INFRASTRUCTURE;
(3) CAPACITY AND TECHNOLOGY FOR SORTING COVERED
MATERIALS;
(4) WHETHER A COVERED MATERIAL IS:
(I) OF A TYPE AND FORM THAT IS REGULARLY SORTED AND
AGGREGATED INTO DEFINED STREAMS FOR RECYCLING PROCESSES; OR
(II) INCLUDED IN A SPECIFICATION OF THE INSTITUTE OF
SCRAP RECYCLING INDUSTRIES, OR A SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION;
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(5) AVAILABILITY OF RESPONSIBLE END MARKETS;
(6) PRESENCE AND AMOUNT OF PROCESSING RESIDUALS,
CONTAMINATION, AND TOXIC SUBSTANCES;
(7) QUANTITY OF COVERED MATERIAL ESTIMATED TO BE AVAILABLE
AND RECOVERABLE;
(8) PROJECTED FUTURE CONDITIONS FOR THE CRITERIA UNDER
ITEMS (1) THROUGH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(9) ANY OTHER CRITERIA OR FACTOR, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AMEND A LIST COMPLETED UNDER THIS
SECTION AT ANY TIME.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE AN AMENDED LIST
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS WITHIN
A REASONABLE AMOUNT OF TIME, DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, AFTER
AMENDING THE LIST.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF AN AMENDED LIST, A PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION SHALL:
1. PROVIDE THE LIST TO SERVICE PROVIDERS AS SOON
AS PRACTICABLE AFTER RECEIVING THE AMENDED LIST; AND
2. WORK TO INCORPORATE CHANGES IN RELEVANT
SERVICE PROVIDER REIMBURSEMENT RATES WITHIN 1 CALENDAR YEAR.
(E) (1) (I) A PRODUCER MAY REQUEST, ON A FORM PRESCRIBED BY
THE DEPARTMENT, THAT THE DEPARTMENT CLASSIFY ONE OR MORE TYPES OF
PACKAGING AS AN EXEMPT MATERIAL.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REQUEST RECEIVED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO THE ADVISORY COUNCIL FOR REVIEW AND COMMENT
BEFORE APPROVING OR DENYING THE REQUEST.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY APPROVE THE REQUEST ONLY IF THE DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT A SPECIFIC FEDERAL OR STATE HEALTH AND SAFETY
– 45 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
REQUIREMENT PREVENTS THE PACKAGING FROM BEING WASTE REDUCED OR MADE
REUSABLE, RECYCLABLE, OR COMPOSTABLE.
(3) WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE DEPARTMENT
RECEIVES A REQUEST UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) REVIEW AND APPROVE OR DENY THE REQUEST; OR
(II) REQUEST ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE
PRODUCER.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH AND UPDATE AS NECESSARY
ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE A LIST OF MATERIALS EXEMPTED BY REQUEST
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) (I) AN EXEMPTION APPROVED PER A REQUEST UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL EXPIRE 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE DEPARTMENT
APPROVES THE REQUEST.
(II) A PRODUCER MAY FILE A SUBSEQUENT REQUEST THAT THE
DEPARTMENT CLASSIFY ONE OR MORE TYPES OF PACKAGING AS AN EXEMPT
MATERIAL AFTER THE EXPIRATION OF THE CLASSIFICATION UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
9–2507. 9–2509.
(A) BEGINNING MARCH 1, 2028 JULY 1, 2029, EACH PRODUCER OR
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION THAT HAS AN APPROVED PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY PLAN ON FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ANNUALLY
TO THE DEPARTMENT ON THE PROGRESS TOWARD MEETING PLAN REQUIREMENTS
AND GOALS FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(B) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE REIMBURSEMENT METHODS
USED FOR COLLECTING, TRANSPORTING, AND PROCESSING PACKAGING COVERED
MATERIALS;
(2) (I) THE STATUS ON ACHIEVING THE PERFORMANCE GOALS
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–2505(C)(3) § 9–2505(C)(1)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(II) IF THE GOALS HAVE NOT BEEN ACHIEVED, A DESCRIPTION
OF THE ACTIONS PROPOSED TO ACHIEVE THE GOALS;
(3) THE AMOUNT OF EACH PACKAGING COVERED MATERIAL TYPE
COLLECTED IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE METHOD OF DISPOSITION OF EACH
PACKAGING MATERIAL TYPE;
(4) THE TOTAL COST OF IMPLEMENTING THE PLAN, AS DETERMINED
BY AN INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDITOR, INCLUDING:
(I) A COPY OF THE WORK PRODUCT OF THE INDEPENDENT
FINANCIAL AUDITOR; AND
(II) FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DETAILING ALL PAYMENTS
RECEIVED AND ISSUED BY THE PRODUCERS COVERED UNDER THE APPROVED PLAN;
(5) SAMPLES OF ALL EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS PROVIDED TO
CONSUMERS OR OTHER ENTITIES;
(6) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE ACTIONS TAKEN AND AN
EVALUATION OF THE METHODS USED TO DISSEMINATE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS,
INCLUDING RECOMMENDATIONS, IF ANY, FOR HOW THE EDUCATIONAL COMPONENT
OF THE PLAN CAN BE IMPROVED;
(7) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF INVESTMENTS MADE IN MARKET
DEVELOPMENT AND FOR IMPROVING REUSE, ORGANICS RECYCLING COMPOSTING,
AND RECYCLING INFRASTRUCTURE;
(8) PROOF OF A THIRD–PARTY AUDIT OF:
(I) THE REDUCTION IN PACKAGING COVERED MATERIALS
REPORTED;
(II) THE DATA USED TO DETERMINE THE STATUS OF ACHIEVING
PERFORMANCE GOALS;
(III) THE AMOUNT OF EACH PACKAGING COVERED MATERIAL
TYPE COLLECTED IN THE STATE; AND
(IV) THE OVERALL REDEMPTION RATE AND RECYCLING RATE OF
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS IN THE STATE; AND
(9) ANY OTHER INFORMATION AS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
– 47 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) WHEN PROVIDING THE DEPARTMENT WITH THE ANNUAL REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
ORGANIZATION SHALL PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT THE DEPARTMENT’S ESTIMATED
COSTS OF ADMINISTERING, OVERSEEING, AND ENFORCING THE PLAN FOR THE 1
YEAR IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE ANNUAL REPORT.
(D) FINANCIAL, PRODUCTION, OR SALES DATA REPORTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT BY A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
SHALL BE KEPT CONFIDENTIAL BY THE DEPARTMENT AND MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO
PUBLIC INSPECTION.
(E) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE REPORT SHALL BE
POSTED ON THE WEBSITE OF THE DEPARTMENT AND THE PRODUCER OR PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION.
9–2508. 9–2510.
ANY PERSON PARTICIPATING IN A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY PLAN IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IS IMMUNE FROM LIABILITY UNDER STATE LAW
RELATING TO ANTITRUST AND RESTRAINT OF TRADE FOR ANY COOPERATED
ACTIVITIES ARISING OUT OF THE RECYCLING, REUSE, AND DISPOSAL OF PACKAGING
COVERED MATERIALS.
9–2509. 9–2511.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) MAY ESTABLISH CRITERIA REGARDING PROVIDING BENEFITS TO
THE ENVIRONMENT AND MINIMIZING RISKS TO PUBLIC HEALTH AND WORKER
HEALTH AND SAFETY; AND
(2) SHALL ESTABLISH, OR REQUIRE A PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY
PLAN TO ESTABLISH, A PROCESS FOR VALIDATING RESPONSIBLE END MARKETS.
9–2510. 9–2512.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF
THIS SECTION, THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 9–334 THROUGH 9–344 OF THIS TITLE APPLY
TO ENFORCE VIOLATIONS OF:
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 431
(1) THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) ANY ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) A PRODUCER OR PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY OF
$5,000;
(II) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY
OF $10,000; AND
(III) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, A CIVIL PENALTY
OF $20,000.
(2) A PENALTY MAY NOT BE IMPOSED ON A PRODUCER UNDER THIS
SECTION UNLESS:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT FIRST ISSUES A WRITTEN NOTICE OF
VIOLATION TO THE PRODUCER; AND
(II) THE VIOLATION IS NOT CORRECTED WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF THE WRITTEN NOTICE.
(3) AFTER THE 60–DAY PERIOD SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH DAY THAT A VIOLATION CONTINUES IS A SEPARATE
VIOLATION.
(C) IF, BASED ON THE ANNUAL REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER § 9–2507 §
9–2509 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE PERFORMANCE GOALS ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–2505(C)(3) § 9–2505(C)(1)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE HAVE NOT BEEN ACHIEVED, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY, NOT TO EXCEED
$250,000, ON THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION.
(D) ANY PENALTY COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE PAID INTO THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1707 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2025, each local government in the State shall file a feasibility plan with the Department
of the Environment that prioritizes the sale of recycled packaging materials back to
– 49 –

Ch. 431 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
manufacturers that have a manufacturing facility in the State if a beverage container
deposit return program is enacted in the State, the Department of the Environment shall:
(1) coordinate the implementation of the beverage container deposit return
program in a manner that ensures compatibility with producer responsibility plans and
related provisions of law as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) ensure that:
(i) materials covered in the beverage container deposit program are
exempt from producer responsibility plans; or
(ii) related financial obligations are reduced.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 50 –